Utah statutes.
26-31-202.   Blood donation by a minor.

A minor who is at least 16 years old may donate blood to a voluntary, noncompensatory blood donation program if a parent or legal guardian of the minor consents to the donation.



Enacted by Chapter 90, 2011 General Session

